Montana, session 2025, HB692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 2-12-104, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-12-104. Annual plan. (1) Each department shall produce an annual plan no later than September
1, 2023.
(2) Each department shall publish a subsequent annual plan no later than September 1 every 2
years afterward each year.
(3) At a minimum, an annual plan must include the following components:
(a) a description of the functions and divisions of the department, including a discussion of the
department's priorities;
(b) initiatives of the department for each program, as that term is used in 17-7-111, that reflect the
benefits and outcomes the department expects to achieve on behalf of the public or specific groups through its
divisions; and
(c) specific and measurable performance measures for its initiatives, including the preferred
outcomes and outputs with respect to each initiative.
(4) Performance measures must:
(a) be tracked on an ongoing basis;
(b) assess a department's preferred outcomes and outputs;
(c) be quantitative when possible; and
(d) be designed to provide meaningful and useful information to policymakers and the public.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 692
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 692
(5) The annual plan adopted by a department must be posted on the websites of the department."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 692
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 692, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 692
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING THE SMART ACT; REQUIRING DEPARTMENTS TO PROVIDE ANNUAL
PLANS EACH YEAR; REQUIRING DEPARTMENTS TO INCLUDE PROGRAM-LEVEL INITIATIVES IN THE
REPORT; AMENDING SECTION 2-12-104, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”